Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 10
JURY TRIALS

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1972. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note before the article 1 heading.

Section

PART 1 COMPOSITION AND SELECTION
OF THE JURY

PART 2 EVIDENCE OF INCONSISTENT STATEMENTS - VARIANCE

PART 3 EVIDENCE OF SIMILAR TRANSACTIONS

PART 4 TRIAL PROCEEDINGS